Tennessee, session 114, SB1997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-5-101(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), the nominating petition of a member of
the senate who has held office for at least eight (8) consecutive years or a member of
the house of representatives who has held office for at least ten (10) consecutive years
may be signed by registered voters who are not eligible to vote to fill that member's
office if the registered voters reside in the county in which the district lies.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1997
011866
- 1 -